Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 1. President.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

77 Am. Jur. 2d, United States, § 19.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 91, 94, 97, 111(1), 174, 210(2)

91 C.J.S., United States, §§ 27, 28.

Sec. 15.30.010.
Provision for selection of electors.

Electors of President and Vice President of the United States are selected by election at the general election in presidential election years, in the manner and as determined by the ranked-choice method of tabulating votes described in AS

15.15.350

—

15.15.370

.

History.

(§ 6.01 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 10 ch 71 SLA 1972; § 43, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2020 [effective in 2021] changes to this section, see sec. 1 of 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, added “, in the manner and as determined by the ranked-choice method of tabulating votes described in AS

15.15.350

–

15.15.370

” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

Section 73, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that amended this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this act are independent and severable. If any provision of this act, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 15.30.020.
Number and manner of selecting candidates.

Each political party shall select a number of candidates for electors of President and Vice-President of the United States equal to the number of senators and representatives to which the state is entitled in Congress. The candidates for electors shall be selected by the state party convention or in any other manner prescribed by the bylaws of the party. The chairperson and secretary of the state convention or any other party official designated by the party bylaws shall certify a list of the names of candidates for electors to the director on or before September 1 in presidential election years.

History.

(§ 6.02 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 143 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 61 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.30.025.
Qualifications for limited political parties.

A limited political party may be organized for the purpose of selecting candidates for electors of President and Vice-President of the United States by filing with the director at least 90 days before a presidential general election a petition signed by qualified voters of the state equaling in number at least one percent of the number of voters who cast ballots for President at the last presidential election. The petition shall state that the signers intend to organize a limited political party, that they intend to select candidates for electors of President and Vice-President of the United States at the next succeeding presidential election, and the name of the limited political party.

A limited political party organized under this section may not assume a name which is so similar to an existing political party as to confuse or mislead the voters at an election. If the director determines that the name of the limited political party set out in a petition is confusing or misleading, the director may refuse to accept the petition for filing.

A limited political party organized under this section ceases to be a limited political party if its presidential candidate fails to receive at least three percent of the number of voters who cast ballots for the office of President at a presidential election.

History.

(§ 1 ch 160 SLA 1970; am § 144 ch 100 SLA 1980; am §§ 28, 29 ch 85 SLA 1986)

Sec. 15.30.026.
Qualifications for independent candidates for President of the United States; selection of candidate for Vice-President; selection of electors.

A person who desires to be an independent candidate for President of the United States must file with the director not earlier than January 1 of a presidential election year and not later than the 90th day before a presidential general election a petition signed by qualified voters of the state equal in number to at least one percent of the number of voters who cast ballots in an election under this chapter for President of the United States at the last presidential general election. The petition must state that the signers desire the named candidate for President of the United States to appear on the ballot as an independent candidate for president at the next succeeding presidential general election.

In order to appear on the ballot, a candidate who has qualified for ballot status under (a) of this section shall certify the following information to the director on or before September 1 of the year of the presidential general election:

the names of the electors for the independent candidate for President of the United States, equal to the number of senators and representatives to which the state is entitled in Congress;

the name of a candidate for Vice-President, selected by the independent candidate; and

the name, Alaska mailing address, and signature of the candidate’s state campaign chair, who must be a state resident.

History.

(§ 28 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.30.030.
Qualification of electors.

Any qualified voter except a United States senator or representative or person holding an office of trust or profit under the United States may be selected as a candidate for elector.

History.

(§ 6.03 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.30.040.
Requirement of party pledge.

The party shall require from each candidate for elector a pledge that as an elector the person will vote for the candidates nominated by the party of which the person is a candidate.

History.

(§ 6.04 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.30.050.
Interpretation of votes cast for candidates for President and Vice-President.

In voting for presidential electors, a vote marked for the candidates for President and Vice-President is considered and counted as a vote for the presidential electors of the party or for the presidential electors named under AS

15.30.026

, as appropriate.

History.

(§ 6.05 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 29 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.30.060.
Notification of electors.

When the results of the election of presidential electors have been determined, the director shall send a certificate of election to each elector and shall notify the electors of the time and place of their meeting and of their duties as electors.

History.

(§ 6.06 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 145 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.30.070.
Place and time of meeting.

The electors shall meet at the office of the director or other place designated by the director at 11:00 o’clock in the morning on the first Monday after the second Wednesday in December following their election. If Congress fixes a different day for the meeting, the electors shall meet on the day designated by the Act of Congress.

History.

(§ 6.07 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 146 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.30.080.
Filling of vacancies.

If there is a vacancy caused by death, failure to attend, ineligibility, or other cause, and if available alternates have not been designated, the electors shall fill the vacancy by plurality vote.

History.

(§ 6.08 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 25 ch 136 SLA 1966)

Sec. 15.30.090.
Duties of electors.

After any vacancies have been filled, the electors shall proceed to cast their votes for the candidates for the office of President and Vice-President of the party that selected them as candidates for electors, or for the candidates for the office of President and Vice-President under AS

15.30.026

if the electors were named under AS

15.30.026

, and shall perform the duties of electors as required by the constitution and laws of the United States. The director shall provide administrative services and the Department of Law shall provide legal services necessary for the electors to perform their duties.

History.

(§ 6.09 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 147 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 30 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.30.100.
Compensation of electors.

Each elector is entitled to receive from the state treasury the same per diem and travel expenses allowed members of the legislature.

History.

(§ 6.10 ch 83 SLA 1960)